Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1699.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5323(c) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5323. Award of custody.* * *(c) Notice.--Any custody order shall include notice of a party's obligations under section [5337] 5337.1 (relating to relocation).* * *Section 2. Section 5337 of Title 23 is repealed:[§ 5337. Relocation.(a) Applicability.--This section applies to any proposed relocation.(b) General rule.--No relocation shall occur unless:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) every individual who has custody rights to the child consents to the proposed relocation; or(2) the court approves the proposed relocation.(c) Notice.--(1) The party proposing the relocation shall notify every other individual who has custody rights to the child.(2) Notice, sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, shall be given no later than:(i) the 60th day before the date of the proposed relocation; or(ii) the tenth day after the date that the individual knows of the relocation, if:(A) the individual did not know and could not reasonably have known of the relocation in sufficient time to comply with the 60-day notice; and(B) it is not reasonably possible to delay the date of relocation so as to comply with the 60-day notice.(3) Except as provided by section 5336 (relating to access to records and information), the following information, if available, must be included with the notice of the proposed relocation:(i) The address of the intended new residence.(ii) The mailing address, if not the same as the address of the intended new residence.(iii) Names and ages of the individuals in the new residence, including individuals who intend to live in the new residence.(iv) The home telephone number of the intended new residence, if available.20250HB1699PN2087 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) The name of the new school district and school.(vi) The date of the proposed relocation.(vii) The reasons for the proposed relocation.(viii) A proposal for a revised custody schedule.(ix) Any other information which the party proposing the relocation deems appropriate.(x) A counter-affidavit as provided under subsection (d)(1) which can be used to object to the proposed relocation and the modification of a custody order.(xi) A warning to the nonrelocating party that if the nonrelocating party does not file with the court an objection to the proposed relocation within 30 days after receipt of the notice, that party shall be foreclosed from objecting to the relocation.(4) If any of the information set forth in paragraph (3) is not known when the notice is sent but is later made known to the party proposing the relocation, then that party shall promptly inform every individual who received notice under this subsection.(d) Objection to proposed relocation.--(1) A party entitled to receive notice may file with the court an objection to the proposed relocation and seek a temporary or permanent order to prevent the relocation. The nonrelocating party shall have the opportunity to indicate whether he objects to relocation or not and whether he objects to modification of the custody order or not. If the party objects to either relocation or modification of the custody order, a hearing shall be held as provided in subsection (g)(1). The objection shall be made by completing and returning to the court a counter-affidavit, which shall 20250HB1699PN2087 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be verified subject to penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities), in substantially the following form:COUNTER-AFFIDAVIT REGARDING RELOCATIONThis proposal of relocation involves the following child/children:Child's Name Age Currently residing at:...................... ................. .......................Child's Name Age Currently residing at:...................... ................. .......................Child's Name Age Currently residing at:...................... ................. .......................I have received a notice of proposed relocation and1. .... I do not object to the relocation and I do not object to the modification of the custody order consistent with the proposal for revised custody schedule as attached to the notice.2. .... I do not object to the relocation, but I do object to modification of the custody order, and I request that a hearing be scheduled:a. .... Prior to allowing (name of child/children) to relocate.b. .... After the child/children relocate.3. .... I do object to the relocation and I do object to the modification of the custody order, and I further request that a hearing be held on both matters prior to the relocation taking place.................................................................I understand that in addition to checking (2) or (3) above, I must also file this notice with the court in writing and serve it on the other party by certified mail, return receipt 20250HB1699PN2087 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requested. If I fail to do so within 30 days of my receipt of the proposed relocation notice, I shall be foreclosed from objecting to the relocation.................................................................I verify that the statements made in this counter-affidavit are true and correct. I understand that false statements herein are made subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).Date:................................................................................................................................(2) An objection made under this subsection shall be filed with the court within 30 days of receipt of the proposed relocation notice and served on the other party by certified mail, return receipt requested.(3) If notice of the proposed relocation has been properly given and no objection to the proposed relocation has been filed in court, then it shall be presumed that the nonrelocating party has consented to the proposed relocation.(4) If a party who has been given proper notice does not file with the court an objection to the relocation within 30 days after receipt of the notice but later petitions the court for review of the custodial arrangements, the court shall not accept testimony challenging the relocation.(e) Confirmation of relocation.--If no objection to the proposed relocation is filed under subsection (d), the party proposing the relocation shall file the following with the court prior to the relocation:(1) an affidavit stating that the party provided notice to every individual entitled to notice, the time to file an 20250HB1699PN2087 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 objection to the proposed relocation has passed and no individual entitled to receive notice has filed an objection to the proposed relocation;(2) Proof that proper notice was given in the form of a return receipt with the signature of the addressee and the full notice that was sent to the addressee.(3) a petition to confirm the relocation and modify any existing custody order; and(4) a proposed order containing the information set forth in subsection (c)(3).(f) Modification of custody order.--If a counter-affidavit regarding relocation is filed with the court which indicates the nonrelocating party both has no objection to the proposed relocation and no objection to the modification of the custody order consistent with the proposal for revised custody schedule, the court may modify the existing custody order by approving the proposal for revised custody schedule submitted under subsection (c)(3)(viii), and shall specify the method by which its future modification can be made if desired by either party. If a counter-affidavit regarding relocation is filed with the court which indicates the nonrelocating party objects either to the proposed relocation or to the modification of the custody order consistent with the proposal for revised custody schedule, the court shall modify the existing custody order only after holding a hearing to establish the terms and conditions of the order pursuant to the relocation indicating the rights, if any, of the nonrelocating parties.(g) Hearing.--(1) Except as set forth in paragraph (3), the court shall hold an expedited full hearing on the proposed 20250HB1699PN2087 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relocation after a timely objection has been filed and before the relocation occurs.(2) Except as set forth in paragraph (3), the court may, on its own motion, hold an expedited full hearing on the proposed relocation before the relocation occurs.(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), if the court finds that exigent circumstances exist, the court may approve the relocation pending an expedited full hearing.(4) If the court approves the proposed relocation, it shall:(i) modify any existing custody order; or(ii) establish the terms and conditions of a custody order.(h) Relocation factors.--In determining whether to grant a proposed relocation, the court shall consider the following factors, giving weighted consideration to those factors which affect the safety of the child:(1) The nature, quality, extent of involvement and duration of the child's relationship with the party proposing to relocate and with the nonrelocating party, siblings and other significant persons in the child's life.(2) The age, developmental stage, needs of the child and the likely impact the relocation will have on the child's physical, educational and emotional development, taking into consideration any special needs of the child.(3) The feasibility of preserving the relationship between the nonrelocating party and the child through suitable custody arrangements, considering the logistics and financial circumstances of the parties.(4) The child's preference, taking into consideration 20250HB1699PN2087 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the age and maturity of the child.(5) Whether there is an established pattern of conduct of either party to promote or thwart the relationship of the child and the other party.(6) Whether the relocation will enhance the general quality of life for the party seeking the relocation, including, but not limited to, financial or emotional benefit or educational opportunity.(7) Whether the relocation will enhance the general quality of life for the child, including, but not limited to, financial or emotional benefit or educational opportunity.(8) The reasons and motivation of each party for seeking or opposing the relocation.(9) The present and past abuse committed by a party or member of the party's household and whether there is a continued risk of harm to the child or an abused party.(10) Any other factor affecting the best interest of the child.(i) Burden of proof.--(1) The party proposing the relocation has the burden of establishing that the relocation will serve the best interest of the child as shown under the factors set forth in subsection (h).(2) Each party has the burden of establishing the integrity of that party's motives in either seeking the relocation or seeking to prevent the relocation.(j) Failure to provide reasonable notice.--The court may consider a failure to provide reasonable notice of a proposed relocation as:(1) a factor in making a determination regarding the 20250HB1699PN2087 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relocation;(2) a factor in determining whether custody rights should be modified;(3) a basis for ordering the return of the child to the nonrelocating party if the relocation has occurred without reasonable notice;(4) sufficient cause to order the party proposing the relocation to pay reasonable expenses and counsel fees incurred by the party objecting to the relocation; and(5) a ground for contempt and the imposition of sanctions against the party proposing the relocation.(k) Mitigation.--Any consideration of a failure to provide reasonable notice under subsection (i) shall be subject to mitigation if the court determines that such failure was caused in whole, or in part, by abuse.(l) Effect of relocation prior to hearing.--If a party relocates with the child prior to a full expedited hearing, the court shall not confer any presumption in favor of the relocation.]Section 3. Title 23 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5337.1. Relocation.(a) Applicability.--This section applies to any proposed relocation.(b) Conditions.--A relocation may not occur unless the relocating party has filed a custody complaint with request to relocate, if there is not an existing custody action, or a petition for relocation and modification, if there is an existing custody action, and:(1) every individual who has custody rights to the child consents to the proposed relocation by written agreement; or20250HB1699PN2087 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) the court approves the proposed relocation.(c) Service.--(1) The relocating party shall serve the custody complaint with request to relocate or the petition for relocation and modification by original process.(2) The custody complaint with request to relocate or the petition for relocation and modification shall be served no later than:(i) the 60th day before the date of the proposed relocation; or(ii) the 10th day after the date that the relocating party knows of the relocation, if:(A) the relocating party did not know and could not reasonably have known of the relocation in sufficient time to comply with the 60-day requirement; and(B) it is not reasonably possible to delay the date of relocation so as to comply with the 60-day requirement.(d) Contents.--(1) Except as provided under section 5336 (relating to access to records and information), the following information, if available, must be included in the custody complaint with request to relocate or the petition for relocation and modification:(i) A notice on the front of the document containing a warning to the nonrelocating party that if the nonrelocating party does not file an answer to the custody complaint with request to relocate or the petition for relocation and modification within 20 days 20250HB1699PN2087 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 after service of the custody complaint with request to relocate or the petition for relocation and modification with the court, the nonrelocating party shall be foreclosed from objecting to the relocation.(ii) The address of the intended new residence.(iii) The mailing address, if not the same as the address of the intended new residence.(iv) Names and ages of the individuals in the new residence, including individuals who intend to live in the new residence.(v) The home telephone number of the intended new residence, if available.(vi) The name of the new school district and school.(vii) The date of the proposed relocation.(viii) The reasons for the proposed relocation.(ix) A proposal for a revised custody schedule.(x) Any other information that the party proposing the relocation deems appropriate.(xi) All information regularly included in a custody complaint in accordance with Pa.R.C.P. Nos. 1915.3 (relating to Commencement of Action. Complaint. Order) and 1915.15 (relating to Form of Complaint. Caption. Order. Petition to Modify a Custody Order) when filing a custody complaint with request to relocate.(2) If any of the information specified in paragraph (1) is not known when the custody complaint with request to relocate or the petition for relocation and modification is filed with the court but later becomes known to the relocating party, the relocating party shall promptly file an amended custody complaint with request to relocate or an 20250HB1699PN2087 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amended petition for relocation and modification with the information included.(e) Objection to proposed relocation.--(1) If the nonrelocating party objects to the relocation within 20 days of service of the custody complaint with request to relocate or the petition for relocation and modification, the nonrelocating party shall file an answer objecting to the proposed relocation. If the nonrelocating party objects to either relocation or modification of the custody order, a full-factors hearing shall be held as provided in accordance with subsection (f).(2) If an answer objecting to the proposed relocation has not been timely filed in court, it shall be presumed that the nonrelocating party has consented to the proposed relocation and the court shall enter an appropriate order.(f) Expedited pretrial conference and hearing.--(1) After the relocating party files a custody complaint with request to relocate or a petition for relocation and modification and an answer is filed, the court shall hold an expedited pretrial conference. The court is encouraged to use advanced technology, including video conferencing and telephonic means, to enable the pretrial conference to occur as quickly as possible. Ten days prior to the expedited pretrial conference, the parties shall file pretrial statements with the court, specifying a factual and procedural history of the case and an analysis of the custody factors and relocation factors.(2) If an agreement is not reached at the pretrial conference, the court shall hold a full-factors hearing on an expedited basis.20250HB1699PN2087 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If the court approves the proposed relocation, it shall:(i) modify any existing custody order; or(ii) establish the terms and conditions of a custody order.(4) If the court does not approve the relocation, it shall enter an appropriate order.(g) Relocation factors.--In determining whether to grant a proposed relocation, the court shall consider the following factors, giving weighted consideration to those factors that affect the safety of the child:(1) The nature, quality, extent of involvement and duration of the child's relationship with the relocating party and with the nonrelocating party, siblings and other significant individuals in the child's life.(2) The age, developmental stage and needs of the child and the likely impact that the relocation will have on the child's physical, educational and emotional development, taking into consideration any special needs of the child.(3) The feasibility of preserving the relationship between the nonrelocating party and the child through suitable custody arrangements, considering the logistics and financial circumstances of the parties.(4) The child's preference, taking into consideration the age and maturity of the child.(5) Whether there is an established pattern of conduct of either party to promote or thwart the relationship of the child and the other party.(6) Whether the relocation will enhance the general quality of life for the relocating party, including financial 20250HB1699PN2087 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or emotional benefit or educational opportunity.(7) Whether the relocation will enhance the general quality of life for the child, including financial or emotional benefit or educational opportunity.(8) The reasons and motivation of each party for seeking or opposing the relocation.(9) If applicable, the reason and motivation of the relocating party for not filing a custody complaint with request to relocate or a petition for relocation and modification earlier to the extent that the reason and motivation impacts the best interest of the child.(10) The present and past abuse committed by a party or member of the party's household and whether there is a continued risk of harm to the child or an abused party.(11) Any other factor affecting the best interest of the child.(h) Burden of proof.--(1) The relocating party has the burden of establishing that the relocation will serve the best interest of the child as shown under the factors specified in subsection (g).(2) Each party has the burden of establishing the integrity of that party's motives in either seeking the relocation or seeking to prevent the relocation.(i) Failure to comply.--The court may consider a failure to comply with this section as:(1) a factor in making a determination regarding the relocation;(2) a factor in determining whether custody rights should be modified;(3) a basis for ordering the return of the child to the 20250HB1699PN2087 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonrelocating party if the relocation has occurred prior to the filing of a custody complaint with request to relocate or a petition for relocation and modification;(4) sufficient cause to order the relocating party to pay reasonable expenses and counsel fees incurred by the nonrelocating party; and(5) a ground for contempt and the imposition of sanctions against the relocating party.(j) Mitigation.--Any consideration of a failure to comply with this section shall be subject to mitigation if the court determines that the failure was caused, in whole or in part, by abuse.(k) Effect of relocation prior to hearing.--If a party relocates with the child prior to a full expedited hearing, the court shall not confer any presumption in favor of the relocation.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1699PN2087 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617